Vermont, session 2025-2026, H752.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 3303 is amended to read:
§ 3303. REPORTING, RECORDS, AND REVIEW REQUIREMENTS
(a) Annual report and budget. The Secretary shall submit to the House
Committee on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on
Institutions, concurrent with the Governor’s annual budget request required
under 32 V.S.A. § 306, an annual report for information technology and
VT LEG #385530 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.752
2026 Page 2 of 6
cybersecurity. The report shall reflect the priorities of the Agency and shall
include:
* * *
(8) an annual update to the inventory required by section 3305 of this
title, including detail on any occasions where the Agency requested that the use
of an automated decision system be terminated; and
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 3305 is amended to read:
§ 3305. AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM; STATE PROCUREMENT;
INVENTORY; TERMINATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Algorithm” means a computerized procedure consisting of a set of
steps used to accomplish a determined task.
(2) “Automated decision system” means any algorithm, including one
incorporating machine learning or other artificial intelligence techniques, that
uses data-based analytics to make or support government decisions, judgments,
or conclusions.
(3) “Automated final decision system” means an automated decision
system that makes final decisions, judgments, or conclusions without human
intervention.
VT LEG #385530 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.752
2026 Page 3 of 6
(4) “Automated support decision system” means an automated decision
system that provides information to inform the final decision, judgment, or
conclusion of a human decision maker.
(5) “State government” has the same meaning as in section 3301 of this
chapter.
(b) Inventory. The Agency of Digital Services shall conduct a review and
make an inventory of all automated decision systems that are being developed,
employed, or procured by State government. The inventory shall include the
following for each automated decision system:
(1) the automated decision system’s name and vendor;
(2) a description of the automated decision system’s general capabilities,
including:
(A) reasonably foreseeable capabilities outside the scope of the
agency’s proposed use; and
(B) whether the automated decision system is used or may be used
for independent decision-making powers and the impact of those decisions on
Vermont residents;
(3) the type or types of data inputs that the technology uses; how that
data is generated, collected, and processed; and the type or types of data the
automated decision system is reasonably likely to generate;
VT LEG #385530 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.752
2026 Page 4 of 6
(4) whether the automated decision system has been tested for bias by
an independent third party, has a known bias, or is untested for bias;
(5) a description of the purpose and proposed use of the automated
decision system, including:
(A) what decision or decisions it will be used to make or support;
(B) whether it is an automated final decision system or automated
support decision system; and
(C) its intended benefits, including any data or research relevant to
the outcome of those results;
(6) how automated decision system data is securely stored and
processed and whether an agency intends to share access to the automated
decision system or the data from that automated decision system with any
other entity, which entity, and why; and
(7) a description of the IT fiscal impacts of the automated decision
system, including:
(A) initial acquisition costs and ongoing operating costs, such as
maintenance, licensing, personnel, legal compliance, use auditing, data
retention, and security costs;
(B) any cost savings that would be achieved through the use of the
technology; and
VT LEG #385530 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.752
2026 Page 5 of 6
(C) any current or potential sources of funding, including any
subsidies or free products being offered by vendors or governmental entities;
(8) whether there is any reasonably foreseeable misuse of the automated
decision system and the development or existence of safeguards against such
misuse;
(9) whether there are any public health or safety risks resulting from the
deployment and use of the automated decision system;
(10) the existence of any cybersecurity vulnerabilities and privacy risks
resulting from the deployment and use of the automated decision system, and
the development or existence of safeguards to mitigate those risks;
(11) the extent to which the deployment and use of the automated
decision system requires input of sensitive and personal data, how that data is
used and stored, and any control users may have over their data; and
(12) the notification mechanism or procedure, if any, by which
individuals impacted by the utilization of the automated decision system may
be notified of the use of such system and the use of the individual’s personal
data.
(c) Termination of use. The Agency shall, in writing, request that a State
government entity terminate its use of an automated decision system if,
through the inventory process pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the
Agency finds that the system:
VT LEG #385530 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.752
2026 Page 6 of 6
(1) produces biased results;
(2) contains unreasonable safety risks, including risks to public health or
to the State’s cybersecurity;
(3) is likely to be misused and does not have proper safeguards against
preventing misuse; or
(4) does not properly safeguard the personal data of Vermonters.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385530 v.1